fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-2-maskihkiy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - maskihkiy - ok : # -m inanimate noun, medicine AEW NI2
     maskihkiy+N+I+Sg: maskihkiy
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nimaskihkiy
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kimaskihkiy
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nimaskihkînân
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg: kimaskihkînaw
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kimaskihkîwâw
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: omaskihkiy
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: omaskihkîwâw
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: omaskihkîyiw

     maskihkiy+N+I+Pl: maskihkiya
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nimaskihkiya
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kimaskihkiya
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nimaskihkînâna
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl: kimaskihkînawa
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kimaskihkîwâwa
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: omaskihkiya
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: omaskihkîwâwa
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: omaskihkîyiwa

     maskihkiy+N+I+Loc: maskihkîhk # Should this -y become assimilated, like the cases below?
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: nimaskihkîhk
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: kimaskihkîhk
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: nimaskihkînâhk
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px21Pl+Loc: kimaskihkînâhk
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: kimaskihkîwâhk
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: omaskihkîhk
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: omaskihkîwâhk
     maskihkiy+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: omaskihkîyihk

     maskihkiy+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [maskihkîs, maskihkîsis]
     maskihkiy+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl: [maskihkîsa, maskihkîsisa]
     maskihkiy+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Loc: [maskihkîsihk, maskihkîsisihk]
     maskihkiy+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: [nimaskihkîs, nimaskihkîsis]
     maskihkiy+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: [nimaskihkîsa, nimaskihkîsisa]
     maskihkiy+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: [nimaskihkîsihk, nimaskihkîsisihk]
